Oklahoma, session 2026, SB570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-702g of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. When a fetal death occurs in a hospital, or when a woman


presents to a hospital for treatment of a miscarriage, the hospital


shall, prior to discharge:


1. Provide the woman or her designee with a physical or digital


copy of the form described in subsection B of this section; and


2. Ensure that a hospital staff member verbally communicates


that the woman or family may request the certificates listed on the


form through the process described on the form.



Req. No. 1303 Page 1


B. The State Department of Health shall, for the purposes of


this section, develop and publish on its public website a form that:


1. Explains the process for requesting a fetal death


certificate under Section 1-318 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes


and the process for requesting a certificate of birth resulting in


stillbirth under Section 1-318.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes; and


2. Provides contact information for the Division of Vital


Records of the Department.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1303 DC 1/19/2025 5:38:57 AM

























Req. No. 1303 Page 2